Utah statutes.
75-5a-107.   Other transfer by fiduciary.

(1)  Subject to Subsection (3), a personal representative or trustee may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of a minor under Section 75-5a-110, in the absence of a will or under a will or trust that does not contain an authorization to do so.

(2)  Subject to Subsection (3), a conservator may make an irrevocable transfer to another adult or trust company as custodian for the benefit of the minor pursuant to Section 75-5a-110.

(3)  A transfer under Subsection 75-5a-110(1) or (2) may be made only if:

(a)  the personal representative, trustee, or conservator considers the transfer to be in the best interest of the minor;

(b)  the transfer is not prohibited by or inconsistent with provisions of the applicable will, trust agreement, or other governing instrument; and

(c)  the transfer is authorized by the court, if it exceeds $10,000 in value.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1990 General Session

